Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-409.01
Applications for surveys; costs advanced; disposition.

There shall accompany all applications for surveys, except those from political subdivisions, a sum sufficient to defray the cost of making such surveys as provided by sections 84-407, 84-407.01, and 84-409, and such advance deposits shall be held in the cash fund until the surveys are made.

Laws 1957, c. 395, § 4, p. 1360.